test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kuorrw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kuoŗŗõ: # Verb 38 'eng /est korjata/fin' - full paradigm
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Inf: kuoŗŗõ
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Ger: kuoŗŗõs
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Sup: kuoŗŗõm
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Sup+Ine: kuoŗŗõmõs
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Sup+Ela: kuoŗŗõmõst
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Sup+Tra: kuoŗŗõmõks
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Sup+Abe: kuoŗŗõmõt
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kūoŗõb
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kuoŗŗõt
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuoŗŗõbõd
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kūoŗiz
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kūoŗizt, kūoŗiztõ]
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kūoŗizt, kūoŗiztõ]
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kuoŗ
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kuoŗŗõks
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kuoŗ
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kuoŗ
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kuoŗŗõgid
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kuoŗŗõg
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Quo+Sg3: kuoŗŗiji
     kuoŗŗõ+V+ActPrfPrc: kuoŗŗõn
     kuoŗŗõ+V+PssPrfPrc: kuoŗdõd
